Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.01.290

Penalty for signing false document.

RCW 23.95.240 governs the penalty that applies for executing a false document that is intended to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

[ 2020 c 57 s 38; 2015 c 176 s 2107; 1989 c 165 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.